Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5183XS (5) 91 dg/ko S.F. 2129 Section 1. Section 228.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10A. âTest dataâ means the same as 3 described in the most recent version of the ethical principles 4 of psychologists and code of conduct standard as published by 5 the American psychological association. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 10B. âTest materialsâ means the same as 7 described in the most recent version of the ethical principles 8 of psychologists and code of conduct standard as published by 9 the American psychological association. 10 Sec. 2. Section 228.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 228.9 Disclosure of psychological test material. 13 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section , a person 14 in possession of psychological test material materials shall 15 not disclose the material test materials to any other person, 16 including the individual who is a subject of the test. In 17 addition, the test material 18 2. Test materials shall not be disclosed in any 19 administrative, judicial, or legislative proceeding. However, 20 upon 21 3. a. Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2, upon the request 22 of an individual who is the subject of a psychological test, 23 all records associated with a that psychological test of that 24 individual shall be disclosed to a psychologist licensed 25 pursuant to chapter 154B and designated by the individual. 26 b. An individualâs request for the records associated with 27 a psychological test of that individual shall be in writing and 28 shall comply with the requirements of section 228.3 , relating 29 to voluntary disclosures of mental health information , except 30 that the individual shall not have the right to inspect the 31 test materials. 32 4. a. This section shall not apply to test data. 33 b. If test data contains test materials used to generate 34 the test data, the test data may be disclosed provided that the 35 -1- LSB 5183XS (5) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 2129 test materials are redacted prior to disclosure of the test 1 data. 2